bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="हम/__RaRTI_u_e1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नियोंZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नियोंZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आपन/__RaRTI_u_e1">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोZथ्ण्झ्के</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
            <s n="o" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="आपन">
      <i>आपन</i>
      <par n="आपन/__RaRTI_u_e1" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हम">
      <i>हम</i>
      <par n="हम/__RaRTI_u_e1" />
    </e>
